Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 3. Reorganization

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks § 628; 13 Am. Jur. 2d Building and Loan Associations §§ 13 to 15.

12A C.J.S. Building and Loan Associations §§ 275 to 279.

§ 13-6-301.
Procedure generally.

Any association organized under the laws of this state, including a mutual savings and loan association, may reorganize the association and provide for the carrying on of its business under the laws of this state by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the shares of the members of the association who vote at the meeting. No meeting shall be called unless the plan has first been approved by the state banking commissioner, the federal deposit insurance corporation and the comptroller of the currency. Notice of the meeting shall contain a statement of the time, place and purpose of the meeting and an outline of the reorganization plan. Notice shall be given by mailing a copy to each shareholder at least thirty (30) days prior to the date of the meeting, addressed to the shareholder at his address shown by the books of the association. Shareholders may vote at the meeting in person or by proxy and all voting shall be by ballot. The plan of reorganization may provide for reincorporation under the existing corporate name or under a different name, may provide for the exchange of shares in the association for shares of the same or a different class in the reorganized association and may fix the time or times prior to which notice of withdrawal of shares issued in exchange for shares in the association being reorganized shall not be given, and, if the withdrawal of the shares is so postponed, this fact shall be printed or stamped on the face of the certificates evidencing shares so to be issued. All obligations to any prior association shall inure to the benefit of the reorganized association and be enforceable by it and in its name, and demands, claims and rights of action against any prior association may be enforced against the reorganized association as fully and completely as they might have been enforced before reorganization.

Associations that are in the course of liquidation may reorganize. No reorganization is effective until approved by the state banking commissioner and the appropriate federal banking regulatory agency and until the members holding three-fourths (3/4) of the outstanding shares have approved the plan in writing.

A copy of the articles of incorporation of the association as reorganized, certified by the secretary of the association, shall be filed with the state banking commissioner in the same manner provided for amendments to articles of incorporation. All pending withdrawal applications shall be cancelled.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 13, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 36-103; W.S. 1957, § 13-216; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2015 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), inserted “including a mutual savings and loan association” in the first sentence, and substituted “comptroller of the currency” for “office of thrift supervision” in the second sentence; in (b), substituted “and the appropriate federal banking regulatory agency” for “the federal deposit insurance corporation and the office of thrift supervision”; and made related changes.

§ 13-6-302.
Conversion to federal association; procedure.

Any state savings and loan association, including a mutual savings and loan association, or any other home financing association, eligible to become a federal savings and loan association may convert itself into a federal savings and loan association by the following procedure:

At any meeting of the shareholders of the association called to consider a conversion and held in accordance with the laws governing the association, the shareholders by an affirmative vote of the majority of the shareholders present in person or by proxy may vote to convert the association into a federal savings and loan association;

A copy of the minutes of the meeting verified by the affidavit of the president and the secretary of the meeting shall be filed within ten (10) days in the state banking commissioner’s office and the appropriate federal banking regulatory agency;

After the adjournment of the meeting of shareholders, the association shall take the necessary action to make it a federal savings and loan association. Within ten (10) days of receipt of the federal charter a copy of the charter issued to the association by the appropriate federal banking regulatory agency or a certificate showing the organization of the association as a federal savings and loan association certified by, or on behalf of the appropriate federal banking regulatory agency shall be filed in the state banking commissioner’s office and upon filing the association ceases to be a state association and becomes a federal savings and loan association.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 60, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 36-401; W.S. 1957, § 13-270; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2015 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “appropriate federal banking regulatory agency” for “federal deposit insurance corporation or the office of thrift supervision” in (a)(i) and (a)(ii); in the introductory language of (a), inserted “including a mutual savings and loan association”; and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-6-303.
Conversion to federal association; effect.

When a conversion becomes effective as provided by W.S.

13-6-302

, an association ceases to be supervised by this state and all of the property of the association shall continue to be vested in the association under its new name and style as a federal savings and loan association.

The federal savings and loan association at the time of the conversion is responsible for all of the obligations of the state association to the same extent as though the conversion had not taken place.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 60, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 36-402; W.S. 1957, § 13-271; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Severability. —

Laws 1935 ch. 60, § 3, provides: “If any provision in this act or the application thereof to any person, corporation or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the act, and the application of such provision to other persons, corporations or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.”

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1935, ch. 60, § 4 repeals all laws or parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 13-6-304.
Conversion to state association; procedure.

Any savings and loan association organized under the federal laws and doing business in this state pursuant to W.S.

13-4-109

through

13-4-112

, including a mutual savings and loan association, may convert itself into a state savings and loan association under the laws of this state by the following procedure:

At any meeting of the shareholders and members of any association called to consider a conversion and held in accordance with the laws governing the association, the shareholders and members by an affirmative vote of a majority of shares represented may vote to convert the association into a guaranty savings and loan association organized under the laws of this state. At this meeting directors of the converted association shall be chosen, and either the meeting shall adopt or the directors chosen shall adopt bylaws for the converted association;

A copy of the minutes of the meeting of the shareholders and members, verified by the affidavit of the president or vice president and the secretary of the meeting, shall be filed within ten (10) days after the meeting with the appropriate federal banking regulatory agency and in the state banking commissioner’s office. The verified copy of the minutes of the meeting, when filed, is presumptive evidence of the holding and the action of the meeting;

The association shall then organize itself as a state savings and loan association under the laws of this state, including the filing of appropriate articles of incorporation, adoption of bylaws and election of officers and full compliance with the provisions of W.S.

13-2-201

,

13-2-202

and

13-2-207

through

13-2-215

. Upon completion of its organization, the association ceases to be a federal savings and loan association and becomes a state savings and loan association subject to the supervision of the state banking commissioner and the appropriate federal banking regulatory agency.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 40, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 36-403; W.S. 1957, § 13-272; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2015 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iii), substituted “W.S.

13-2-201

,

13-2-202

and

13-2-207

through

13-2-215

” for “W.S. 13-6-209 through 13-6-221.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “appropriate federal banking regulatory agency” for “federal deposit insurance corporation or the office of thrift supervision” in (a)(ii) and (a)(iii); in the introductory language of (a), inserted “pursuant to W.S.

13-4-109

through

13-4-112

, including a mutual savings and loan association”; and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 13-6-305.
Conversion to state association; certificate. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 40, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 36-405; W.S. 1957, § 13-274; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 68, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 13-6-306.
Conversion to state association; effect.

When a conversion is effective, all the property of the federal savings and loan association continues to be vested in the association as a state savings and loan association. The state savings and loan association shall remain responsible for all the obligations of the federal association.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 40, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 36-404; W.S. 1957, § 13-273; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

Severability. —

Laws 1941, ch. 40, § 3, provides: “If any provision in this act or the application thereof to any person, corporation or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this act, and the application of such provision to other persons, corporations, or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.”

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1941, ch. 40, § 5, repeals all laws or parts of laws in conflict with that act.